voikko-fi/vvfst/suomi.lexc
LEXICON EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt2
[Bh][Bc]@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@	Sanasto_t	;
[Bh][Bc]@C.JOHDETTAVA_NIMISANAKSI@@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@:@C.JOHDETTAVA_NIMISANAKSI@@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@	Sanasto_n	;
[Bh][Bc]@C.JOHDETTAVA_NIMISANAKSI@@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@:@C.JOHDETTAVA_NIMISANAKSI@@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@	Ys_perusosa_seikkasanasta	;
[Bh][Bc]@C.JOHDETTAVA_NIMISANAKSI@@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@:@C.JOHDETTAVA_NIMISANAKSI@@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@	Sanasto_nl	;
[Bh][Bc]@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@@C.JOHDETTAVA_LAATUSANAKSI@:@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@@C.JOHDETTAVA_LAATUSANAKSI@	Sanasto_l	;
[Bh][Bc]@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@:@P.YS_ALKANUT.ON@	Sanasto_p	;
[Bh][Bc]@C.JOHDETTAVA_NIMISANAKSI@@P.INEN_VAADITTU.ON@:@C.JOHDETTAVA_NIMISANAKSI@@P.INEN_VAADITTU.ON@	Sanasto_ep	;

LEXICON EtuliitteenJatko_ellelteltj
EtuliitteenJatko_elt	;
EtuliitteenJatko_ell	;
-:-	Loppu	;

LEXICON Loppu
@R.VAIN_NIMISANA@[Ln]:@R.VAIN_NIMISANA@	Loppu2	;
@D.VAIN_NIMISANA@:@D.VAIN_NIMISANA@	Loppu2	;

LEXICON Loppu2
@D.JOHDETTAVA_NIMISANAKSI@@D.INEN_VAADITTU@@D.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@D.EI_YKS@@D.JOHDETTAVA_LAATUSANAKSI@@D.PAIKANNIMEN_JL@@D.YS_JATKETTAVA@:@D.JOHDETTAVA_NIMISANAKSI@@D.INEN_VAADITTU@@D.LAINEN_VAADITTU@@D.EI_YKS@@D.JOHDETTAVA_LAATUSANAKSI@@D.PAIKANNIMEN_JL@@D.YS_JATKETTAVA@	#	;

LEXICON Tuta
[Tn1][Eb]ta:ta Loppu ;
[Tt][Ap][P4][Ef]taan:taan Liitesana_a ;
